Florida, session 2026, HB473.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (k) of subsection (5) of section
119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
119.071 General exemptions from inspection or copying of
public records.—
(5) OTHER PERSONAL INFORMATION.—
(k)1. For purposes of this paragraph, the term:
a. "Civilian contractor" or "government employee" means
any person who is authorized to access information that is
deemed "secret" or "top secret" by the Federal Government.
b.a. "Identification and location information" means the:
(I) Home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates of birth
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb473-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 473 2026
of current and former civilian contractors, government
employees, and military personnel, and the telephone numbers
associated with the personal communication devices of current
and former civilian contractors, government employees, and
military personnel.
(II) Home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates of birth
of the spouses and dependents of current and former civilian
contractors, government employees, and military personnel, and
the telephone numbers associated with the personal communication
devices of such spouses and dependents.
(III) Names and locations of schools attended by the
spouses of current and former civilian contractors, government
employees, and military personnel and schools or day care
facilities attended by dependents of current and former civilian
contractors, government employees, and military personnel.
c.b. "Military personnel" means persons employed by the
United States Department of Defense who are authorized to access
information that is deemed "secret" or "top secret" by the
Federal Government or who are servicemembers of a special
operations force.
d.c. "Special operations force" has the same meaning as
provided in s. 943.10(22).
2. Identification and location information held by an
agency is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the
State Constitution if the current or former civilian contractor,
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb473-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 473 2026
government employee, or military personnel member submits to an
agency that has custody of the identification and location
information:
a. A written request to exempt the identification and
location information from public disclosure; and
b. A written statement that he or she has made reasonable
efforts to protect the identification and location information
from being accessible through other means available to the
public.
3. This exemption applies to identification and location
information held by an agency before, on, or after the effective
date of this exemption.
4. This paragraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset
Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed
on October 2, 2031 2029, unless reviewed and saved from repeal
through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. The Legislature finds that it is a public
necessity that the identification and location information of
current and former civilian contractors and government employees
who are authorized to access information that is deemed "secret"
or "top secret" by the Federal Government, and their spouses and
dependents, which is held by an agency be made exempt from s.
119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the
State Constitution. Such current and former civilian contractors
and government employees are at risk of being threatened by
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb473-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 473 2026
terrorist groups because of their access to such information.
The Legislature finds that allowing continued public access to
the identification and location information of such current and
former civilian contractors and government employees, and their
spouses and dependents, jeopardizes the safety of such personnel
and their spouses and dependents. The Legislature further finds
that protecting the safety and security of such current and
former civilian contractors and government employees, and their
spouses and dependents, outweighs any public benefit that may be
derived from the public disclosure of the identification and
location information.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb473-00